Illinois, session 104th, HB4573.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 7-139 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/7-139)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-139)7    Sec. 7-139. Credits and creditable service to employees. 8    (a) Each participating employee shall be granted credits 9and creditable service, for purposes of determining the amount 10of any annuity or benefit to which he or a beneficiary is 11entitled, as follows:12        1. For prior service: Each participating employee who 13    is an employee of a participating municipality or 14    participating instrumentality on the effective date shall 15    be granted creditable service, but no credits under 16    paragraph 2 of this subsection (a), for periods of prior 17    service for which credit has not been received under any 18    other pension fund or retirement system established under 19    this Code, as follows:20        If the effective date of participation for the 21    participating municipality or participating 22    instrumentality is on or before January 1, 1998, 23    creditable service shall be granted for the entire period   HB4573- 2 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    of prior service with that employer without any employee 2    contribution.3        If the effective date of participation for the 4    participating municipality or participating 5    instrumentality is after January 1, 1998, creditable 6    service shall be granted for the last 20% of the period of 7    prior service with that employer, but no more than 5 8    years, without any employee contribution. A participating 9    employee may establish creditable service for the 10    remainder of the period of prior service with that 11    employer by making an application in writing, accompanied 12    by payment of an employee contribution in an amount 13    determined by the Fund, based on the employee contribution 14    rates in effect at the time of application for the 15    creditable service and the employee's salary rate on the 16    effective date of participation for that employer, plus 17    interest at the effective rate from the date of the prior 18    service to the date of payment. Application for this 19    creditable service may be made at any time while the 20    employee is still in service.21        A municipality that (i) has at least 35 employees; 22    (ii) is located in a county with at least 2,000,000 23    inhabitants; and (iii) maintains an independent defined 24    benefit pension plan for the benefit of its eligible 25    employees may restrict creditable service in whole or in 26    part for periods of prior service with the employer if the   HB4573- 3 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    governing body of the municipality adopts an irrevocable 2    resolution to restrict that creditable service and files 3    the resolution with the board before the municipality's 4    effective date of participation. 5        Any person who has withdrawn from the service of a 6    participating municipality or participating 7    instrumentality prior to the effective date, who reenters 8    the service of the same municipality or participating 9    instrumentality after the effective date and becomes a 10    participating employee is entitled to creditable service 11    for prior service as otherwise provided in this 12    subdivision (a)(1) only if he or she renders 2 years of 13    service as a participating employee after the effective 14    date. Application for such service must be made while in a 15    participating status. The salary rate to be used in the 16    calculation of the required employee contribution, if any, 17    shall be the employee's salary rate at the time of first 18    reentering service with the employer after the employer's 19    effective date of participation.20        2. For current service, each participating employee 21    shall be credited with:22            a. Additional credits of amounts equal to each 23        payment of additional contributions received from him 24        under Section 7-173, as of the date the corresponding 25        payment of earnings is payable to him.26            b. Normal credits of amounts equal to each payment   HB4573- 4 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1        of normal contributions received from him, as of the 2        date the corresponding payment of earnings is payable 3        to him, and normal contributions made for the purpose 4        of establishing out-of-state service credits as 5        permitted under the conditions set forth in paragraph 6        6 of this subsection (a).7            c. Municipality credits in an amount equal to 1.4 8        times the normal credits, except those established by 9        out-of-state service credits, as of the date of 10        computation of any benefit if these credits would 11        increase the benefit.12            d. Survivor credits equal to each payment of 13        survivor contributions received from the participating 14        employee as of the date the corresponding payment of 15        earnings is payable, and survivor contributions made 16        for the purpose of establishing out-of-state service 17        credits.18        3. For periods of temporary and total and permanent 19    disability benefits, each employee receiving disability 20    benefits shall be granted creditable service for the 21    period during which disability benefits are payable. 22    Normal and survivor credits, based upon the rate of 23    earnings applied for disability benefits, shall also be 24    granted if such credits would result in a higher benefit 25    to any such employee or his beneficiary.26        4. For authorized leave of absence without pay: A   HB4573- 5 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    participating employee shall be granted credits and 2    creditable service for periods of authorized leave of 3    absence without pay under the following conditions:4            a. An application for credits and creditable 5        service is submitted to the board while the employee 6        is in a status of active employment.7            b. Not more than 12 complete months of creditable 8        service for authorized leave of absence without pay 9        shall be counted for purposes of determining any 10        benefits payable under this Article.11            c. Credits and creditable service shall be granted 12        for leave of absence only if such leave is approved by 13        the governing body of the municipality, including 14        approval of the estimated cost thereof to the 15        municipality as determined by the fund, and employee 16        contributions, plus interest at the effective rate 17        applicable for each year from the end of the period of 18        leave to date of payment, have been paid to the fund in 19        accordance with Section 7-173. The contributions shall 20        be computed upon the assumption earnings continued 21        during the period of leave at the rate in effect when 22        the leave began.23            d. Benefits under the provisions of Sections 24        7-141, 7-146, 7-150 and 7-163 shall become payable to 25        employees on authorized leave of absence, or their 26        designated beneficiary, only if such leave of absence   HB4573- 6 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1        is creditable hereunder, and if the employee has at 2        least one year of creditable service other than the 3        service granted for leave of absence. Any employee 4        contributions due may be deducted from any benefits 5        payable.6            e. No credits or creditable service shall be 7        allowed for leave of absence without pay during any 8        period of prior service.9        5. For military service: The governing body of a 10    municipality or participating instrumentality may elect to 11    allow creditable service to participating employees who 12    leave their employment to serve in the armed forces of the 13    United States for all periods of such service, provided 14    that the person returns to active employment within 90 15    days after completion of full time active duty, but no 16    creditable service shall be allowed such person for any 17    period that can be used in the computation of a pension or 18    any other pay or benefit, other than pay for active duty, 19    for service in any branch of the armed forces of the United 20    States. If necessary to the computation of any benefit, 21    the board shall establish municipality credits for 22    participating employees under this paragraph on the 23    assumption that the employee received earnings at the rate 24    received at the time he left the employment to enter the 25    armed forces. A participating employee in the armed forces 26    shall not be considered an employee during such period of   HB4573- 7 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    service and no additional death and no disability benefits 2    are payable for death or disability during such period.3        Any participating employee who left his employment 4    with a municipality or participating instrumentality to 5    serve in the armed forces of the United States and who 6    again became a participating employee within 90 days after 7    completion of full time active duty by entering the 8    service of a different municipality or participating 9    instrumentality, which has elected to allow creditable 10    service for periods of military service under the 11    preceding paragraph, shall also be allowed creditable 12    service for his period of military service on the same 13    terms that would apply if he had been employed, before 14    entering military service, by the municipality or 15    instrumentality which employed him after he left the 16    military service and the employer costs arising in 17    relation to such grant of creditable service shall be 18    charged to and paid by that municipality or 19    instrumentality.20        Notwithstanding the foregoing, any participating 21    employee shall be entitled to creditable service as 22    required by any federal law relating to re-employment 23    rights of persons who served in the United States Armed 24    Services. Such creditable service shall be granted upon 25    payment by the member of an amount equal to the employee 26    contributions which would have been required had the   HB4573- 8 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    employee continued in service at the same rate of earnings 2    during the military leave period, plus interest at the 3    effective rate.4        5.1. In addition to any creditable service established 5    under paragraph 5 of this subsection (a), creditable 6    service may be granted for up to 48 months of service in 7    the armed forces of the United States.8        In order to receive creditable service for military 9    service under this paragraph 5.1, a participating employee 10    must (1) apply to the Fund in writing and provide evidence 11    of the military service that is satisfactory to the Board; 12    (2) obtain the written approval of the current employer; 13    and (3) make contributions to the Fund equal to (i) the 14    employee contributions that would have been required had 15    the service been rendered as a member, plus (ii) an amount 16    determined by the board to be equal to the employer's 17    normal cost of the benefits accrued for that military 18    service, plus (iii) interest on items (i) and (ii) from 19    the date of first membership in the Fund to the date of 20    payment. The required interest shall be calculated at the 21    regular interest rate.22        The changes made to this paragraph 5.1 by Public Acts 23    95-483 and 95-486 apply only to participating employees in 24    service on or after August 28, 2007 (the effective date of 25    those Public Acts). 26        6. For out-of-state service: Creditable service shall   HB4573- 9 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    be granted for service rendered to an out-of-state local 2    governmental body under the following conditions: The 3    employee had participated and has irrevocably forfeited 4    all rights to benefits in the out-of-state public 5    employees pension system; the governing body of his 6    participating municipality or instrumentality authorizes 7    the employee to establish such service; the employee has 2 8    years current service with this municipality or 9    participating instrumentality; the employee makes a 10    payment of contributions, which shall be computed at 8% 11    (normal) plus 2% (survivor) times length of service 12    purchased times the average rate of earnings for the first 13    2 years of service with the municipality or participating 14    instrumentality whose governing body authorizes the 15    service established plus interest at the effective rate on 16    the date such credits are established, payable from the 17    date the employee completes the required 2 years of 18    current service to date of payment. In no case shall more 19    than 120 months of creditable service be granted under 20    this provision.21        7. For retroactive service: Any employee who could 22    have but did not elect to become a participating employee, 23    or who should have been a participant in the Municipal 24    Public Utilities Annuity and Benefit Fund before that fund 25    was superseded, may receive creditable service for the 26    period of service not to exceed 50 months; however, a   HB4573- 10 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    current or former elected or appointed official of a 2    participating municipality may establish credit under this 3    paragraph 7 for more than 50 months of service as an 4    official of that municipality, if the excess over 50 5    months is approved by resolution of the governing body of 6    the affected municipality filed with the Fund before 7    January 1, 2002.8        Any employee who is a participating employee on or 9    after September 24, 1981 and who was excluded from 10    participation by the age restrictions removed by Public 11    Act 82-596 may receive creditable service for the period, 12    on or after January 1, 1979, excluded by the age 13    restriction and, in addition, if the governing body of the 14    participating municipality or participating 15    instrumentality elects to allow creditable service for all 16    employees excluded by the age restriction prior to January 17    1, 1979, for service during the period prior to that date 18    excluded by the age restriction. Any employee who was 19    excluded from participation by the age restriction removed 20    by Public Act 82-596 and who is not a participating 21    employee on or after September 24, 1981 may receive 22    creditable service for service after January 1, 1979. 23    Creditable service under this paragraph shall be granted 24    upon payment of the employee contributions which would 25    have been required had he participated, with interest at 26    the effective rate for each year from the end of the period   HB4573- 11 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    of service established to date of payment.2        8. For accumulated unused sick leave: A participating 3    employee who is applying for a retirement annuity shall be 4    entitled to creditable service for that portion of the 5    employee's accumulated unused sick leave for which payment 6    is not received, as follows:7            a. Sick leave days shall be limited to those 8        accumulated under a sick leave plan established by a 9        participating municipality or participating 10        instrumentality which is available to all employees or 11        a class of employees.12            b. Except as provided in item b-1, only sick leave 13        days accumulated with a participating municipality or 14        participating instrumentality with which the employee 15        was in service within 60 days of the effective date of 16        his retirement annuity shall be credited; If the 17        employee was in service with more than one employer 18        during this period only the sick leave days with the 19        employer with which the employee has the greatest 20        number of unpaid sick leave days shall be considered.21            b-1. If the employee was in the service of more 22        than one employer as defined in item (2) of paragraph 23        (a) of subsection (A) of Section 7-132 or regional 24        office of education, then the sick leave days from all 25        such employers shall be credited, as long as the 26        creditable service attributed to those sick leave days   HB4573- 12 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1        does not exceed the limitation in item d of this 2        paragraph 8. If the employee was in the service of more 3        than one employer described in paragraph (c) of 4        subsection (B) of Section 7-132 on or after the 5        effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 6        General Assembly, then the sick leave days from all 7        such employers, except for employers from which the 8        employee terminated service before the effective date 9        of this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, 10        shall be credited, as long as the creditable service 11        attributed to those sick leave days does not exceed 12        the limitation in item d of this paragraph 8. In 13        calculating the creditable service under this item 14        b-1, the sick leave days from the last employer shall 15        be considered first, then the remaining sick leave 16        days shall be considered until there are no more days 17        or the maximum creditable sick leave threshold under 18        item d of this paragraph 8 has been reached. 19            c. The creditable service granted shall be 20        considered solely for the purpose of computing the 21        amount of the retirement annuity and shall not be used 22        to establish any minimum service period required by 23        any provision of the Illinois Pension Code, the 24        effective date of the retirement annuity, or the final 25        rate of earnings.26            d. The creditable service shall be at the rate of   HB4573- 13 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1        1/20 of a month for each full sick day, provided that 2        no more than 12 months may be credited under this 3        subdivision 8.4            e. Employee contributions shall not be required 5        for creditable service under this subdivision 8.6            f. Each participating municipality and 7        participating instrumentality with which an employee 8        has service within 60 days of the effective date of his 9        retirement annuity shall certify to the board the 10        number of accumulated unpaid sick leave days credited 11        to the employee at the time of termination of service.12        9. For service transferred from another system: 13    Credits and creditable service shall be granted for 14    service under Article 4, 5, 8, 14, or 16 of this Act, to 15    any active member of this Fund, and to any inactive member 16    who has been a county sheriff, upon transfer of such 17    credits pursuant to Section 4-108.3, 5-235, 8-226.7, 18    14-105.6, or 16-131.4, and payment by the member of the 19    amount by which (1) the employer and employee 20    contributions that would have been required if he had 21    participated in this Fund as a sheriff's law enforcement 22    employee during the period for which credit is being 23    transferred, plus interest thereon at the effective rate 24    for each year, compounded annually, from the date of 25    termination of the service for which credit is being 26    transferred to the date of payment, exceeds (2) the amount   HB4573- 14 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    actually transferred to the Fund. Such transferred service 2    shall be deemed to be service as a sheriff's law 3    enforcement employee for the purposes of Section 7-142.1.4        10. (Blank). 5        11. For service transferred from an Article 3 system 6    under Section 3-110.3: Credits and creditable service 7    shall be granted for service under Article 3 of this Act as 8    provided in Section 3-110.3, to any active member of this 9    Fund, upon transfer of such credits pursuant to Section 10    3-110.3. If the board determines that the amount 11    transferred is less than the true cost to the Fund of 12    allowing that creditable service to be established, then 13    in order to establish that creditable service, the member 14    must pay to the Fund an additional contribution equal to 15    the difference, as determined by the board in accordance 16    with the rules and procedures adopted under this 17    paragraph. If the member does not make the full additional 18    payment as required by this paragraph prior to termination 19    of his participation with that employer, then his or her 20    creditable service shall be reduced by an amount equal to 21    the difference between the amount transferred under 22    Section 3-110.3, including any payments made by the member 23    under this paragraph prior to termination, and the true 24    cost to the Fund of allowing that creditable service to be 25    established, as determined by the board in accordance with 26    the rules and procedures adopted under this paragraph.  HB4573- 15 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1        The board shall establish by rule the manner of making 2    the calculation required under this paragraph 11, taking 3    into account the appropriate actuarial assumptions; the 4    member's service, age, and salary history, and any other 5    factors that the board determines to be relevant. 6        12. For omitted service: Any employee who was employed 7    by a participating employer in a position that required 8    participation, but who was not enrolled in the Fund, may 9    establish such credits under the following conditions:10            a. Application for such credits is received by the 11        Board while the employee is an active participant of 12        the Fund or a reciprocal retirement system.13            b. Eligibility for participation and earnings are 14        verified by the Authorized Agent of the participating 15        employer for which the service was rendered.16        Creditable service under this paragraph shall be 17    granted upon payment of the employee contributions that 18    would have been required had he participated, which shall 19    be calculated by the Fund using the member contribution 20    rate in effect during the period that the service was 21    rendered. 22    (b) Creditable service - amount:23        1. One month of creditable service shall be allowed 24    for each month for which a participating employee made 25    contributions as required under Section 7-173, or for 26    which creditable service is otherwise granted hereunder.   HB4573- 16 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1    One month of creditable service shall be granted for the 2    first month of participating employment, even if earnings 3    are not reported for that month. Not more than 1 month of 4    service shall be credited and counted for 1 calendar 5    month, and not more than 1 year of service shall be 6    credited and counted for any calendar year. A calendar 7    month means a nominal month beginning on the first day 8    thereof, and a calendar year means a year beginning 9    January 1 and ending December 31.10        2. A seasonal employee shall be given 12 months of 11    creditable service if he renders the number of months of 12    service normally required by the position in a 12-month 13    period and he remains in service for the entire 12-month 14    period. Otherwise a fractional year of service in the 15    number of months of service rendered shall be credited.16        3. An intermittent employee shall be given creditable 17    service for only those months in which a contribution is 18    made under Section 7-173.19    (c) No application for correction of credits or creditable 20service shall be considered unless the board receives an 21application for correction while (1) the applicant is a 22participating employee and in active employment with a 23participating municipality or instrumentality, or (2) while 24the applicant is actively participating in a pension fund or 25retirement system which is a participating system under the 26Retirement Systems Reciprocal Act. A participating employee or   HB4573- 17 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1other applicant shall not be entitled to credits or creditable 2service unless the required employee contributions are made in 3a lump sum or in installments made in accordance with board 4rule. Payments made to establish service credit under 5paragraph 1, 4, 5, 5.1, 6, 7, or 12 of subsection (a) of this 6Section must be received by the Board while the applicant is an 7active participant in the Fund or a reciprocal retirement 8system, except that an applicant may make one payment after 9termination of active participation in the Fund or a 10reciprocal retirement system. 11    (d) Upon the granting of a retirement, surviving spouse or 12child annuity, a death benefit or a separation benefit, on 13account of any employee, all individual accumulated credits 14shall thereupon terminate. Upon the withdrawal of additional 15contributions, the credits applicable thereto shall thereupon 16terminate. Terminated credits shall not be applied to increase 17the benefits any remaining employee would otherwise receive 18under this Article.19(Source: P.A. 103-110, eff. 6-29-23.) 20    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 21Section 8.50 as follows: 22    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)23    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 248 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for   HB4573- 18 -LRB104 16608 RPS 30008 b1the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 2Act of the 104th General Assembly.